Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-221
Mayor; law, ordinances; duty to enforce; cooperation with county sheriff.

It shall be the duty of the mayor to enforce the laws of the state and the ordinances of the city; to order, direct and enforce, through the officers of the police department, the arrest and prosecution of persons violating such laws and ordinances; to cooperate with and assist the sheriff of the county in suppressing riots and mobs, and in the arrest and prosecution of persons charged with crimes and misdemeanors.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. II, § 20, p. 430;

C.S.1922, § 3546;

C.S.1929, § 14-221;

R.S.1943, § 14-221.

Mayor is required to assist sheriff of county in certain cases. Barton v. City of Omaha, 180 Neb. 752, 145 N.W.2d 444 (1966).